Vermont, session 2025-2026, H344.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A § 495 is amended to read:
§ 495. UNLAWFUL EMPLOYMENT PRACTICE
* * *
(b)(1) It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to
discharge an employee for other than good cause shown. As used in this
subdivision, “good cause” means either a reasonable, good-faith reason for
VT LEG #379817 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.344
2025 Page 2 of 2
discharge related to a legitimate business reason or that the employee has been
employed by the employer for fewer than 90 days. “Good cause” does not
include reasons for discharge that are trivial, arbitrary, capricious, or otherwise
unrelated to a legitimate business reason. A “legitimate business reason”
includes the employee’s failure to satisfactorily perform job duties.
(2) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit:
(A) the rights of employers to discharge employees for good cause
shown; or
(B) any other rights of employees provided pursuant to law or in a
contract or collective bargaining agreement.
(3) An employer shall post notice of the provisions of this subsection in
a form provided by the Commissioner in a place conspicuous to employees at
the employer’s place of business.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379817 v.1